California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 December 20, 1995, or by increases in the capacity of a facility to the extent that the increased capacity was constructed by an entity holding an ownership interest in or operating the facility and does not exceed 120 percent of the installed capacity as of December 20, 1995, provided that before June 30, 2000, the costs shall apply to over-the-fence arrangements entered into after December 20, 1995, between unaffiliated parties. For the purposes of this subdivision, “affiliated” means any person or entity that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another specified entity. “Control” means either of the following:

(A) The possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or to cause the direction of the management or policies of a person or entity, whether through an ownership, beneficial, contractual, or equitable interest.

(B) Direct or indirect ownership of at least 25 percent of an entity, whether through an ownership, beneficial, or equitable interest.

(2) To load served onsite or under an over-the-fence arrangement by a nonmobile self-cogeneration or cogeneration facility for which the customer was committed to construction as of December 20, 1995, provided that the facility was substantially operational on or before January 1, 1998, or by increases in the capacity of a facility to the extent that the increased capacity was constructed by an entity holding an ownership interest in or operating the facility and does not exceed 120 percent of the installed capacity as of January 1, 1998, provided that before June 30, 2000, the costs shall apply to over-the-fence arrangements entered into after December 20, 1995, between unaffiliated parties.

(3) To load served by existing, new, or portable emergency generation equipment used to serve the customer’s load requirements during periods when utility service is unavailable, provided the emergency generation is not operated in parallel with the integrated electric grid, except on a momentary parallel basis.

(4) After June 30, 2000, to any load served onsite or under an over-the-fence arrangement by any nonmobile self-cogeneration or cogeneration facility.

(b) Further, consistent with state policy, with respect to self-cogeneration or cogeneration deferral agreements, the commission shall do the following:

(1) Provide that a utility shall execute a final self-cogeneration or cogeneration deferral agreement with any customer that, on or before December 20, 1995, had executed a letter of intent (or
 similar documentation) to enter into the agreement with the utility, provided that the final agreement shall be consistent with the terms and conditions set forth in the letter of intent and the commission shall review and approve the final agreement.

(2) Provide that a customer that holds a self-cogeneration or cogeneration deferral agreement that was in place on or before December 20, 1995, or that was executed pursuant to paragraph (1) in the event the agreement expires, or is terminated, may do any of the following:

(A) Continue through December 31, 2001, to receive utility service at the rate and under terms and conditions applicable to the customer under the deferral agreement that, as executed, includes an allocation of uneconomic costs consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 367.

(B) Engage in a direct
 transaction for the purchase of electricity and pay uneconomic costs consistent with Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376.

(C) Construct a self-cogeneration or cogeneration facility of approximately the same capacity as the facility previously deferred, provided that the costs provided in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 shall apply consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 367, unless otherwise authorized by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c).

(3) Subject to the firewall described in subdivision (e) of Section 367, provide that the ratemaking treatment for self-cogeneration or cogeneration deferral agreements executed before December 20, 1995, or executed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be consistent with the ratemaking treatment for the contracts approved before January 1995.

(c) The commission shall authorize,
 within 60 days of the receipt of a joint application from the serving utility and one or more interested parties, applicability conditions as follows:

(1) The costs identified in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 shall not, before June 30, 2000, apply to load served onsite by a nonmobile self-cogeneration or cogeneration facility that became operational on or after December 20, 1995.

(2) The costs identified in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 shall not, before June 30, 2000, apply to a load served under an over-the-fence arrangement entered into after December 20, 1995, between unaffiliated entities.

(d) For the purposes of this section, all onsite or over-the-fence arrangements shall be consistent with Section 218 as it existed on December 20, 1995.

(e) To facilitate the development of new microcogeneration applications, electrical corporations may apply to the commission for a financing order to finance the transition costs to be recovered from customers employing the applications.

(f) To encourage the continued development, installation, and interconnection of clean and efficient self-generation and cogeneration resources, to improve system reliability for consumers by retaining existing generation and encouraging new generation to connect to the electric grid, and to increase self-sufficiency of consumers of electricity through the deployment of self-generation and cogeneration, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The commission and the Electricity Oversight Board shall determine if any policy or action undertaken by the Independent System Operator, directly or indirectly, unreasonably discourages the
 connection of existing self-generation or cogeneration or new self-generation or cogeneration to the grid.

(2) If the commission and the Electricity Oversight Board find that any policy or action of the Independent System Operator unreasonably discourages the connection of existing self-generation or cogeneration or new self-generation or cogeneration to the grid, the commission and the Electricity Oversight Board shall undertake all necessary efforts to revise, mitigate, or eliminate that policy or action of the Independent System Operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 209.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

(a) Electrical corporations may apply to the commission for an order determining that the costs identified in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 not be collected from a particular class of customer or category of electricity consumption.

(b) Subject to the fire wall specified in subdivision (e) of Section 367, the provisions of this section and Sections 372 and 374 shall apply in the event the commission authorizes a nonbypassable charge prior to the implementation of an Independent System Operator and Power Exchange referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 365.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

(a) In recognition of statutory authority and past investments existing as of December 20, 1995, and subject to the firewall specified in subdivision (e) of Section 367, the obligation to pay the uneconomic costs identified in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 shall not apply to the following:

(1) One hundred ten megawatts of load served by irrigation districts, as hereafter allocated by this paragraph:

(A) The 110 megawatts of load shall be allocated among the service territories of the three largest electrical corporations in the ratio of the number of irrigation districts in the service territory of each utility to the total number of irrigation districts in the
 service territories of all three utilities.

(B) The total amount of load allocated to each utility service area shall be phased in over five years beginning January 1, 1997, so that one-fifth of the allocation is allocated in each of the five years. Any allocation that remains unused at the end of any year shall be carried over to the succeeding year and added to the allocation for that year.

(C) The load allocated to each utility service territory pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be further allocated among the respective irrigation districts within that service territory by the Energy Commission. An individual irrigation district requesting an allocation shall submit to the commission by January 31, 1997, detailed plans that show the load that it serves or will serve and for which it intends to use the allocation within the timeframe requested. These plans shall include
 specific information on the irrigation districts’ organization for electric distribution, contracts, financing and engineering plans for capital facilities, as well as detailed information about the loads to be served, and shall not be less than eight megawatts or more than 40 megawatts, provided, however, that any portion of the 110 megawatts that remains unallocated may be reallocated to projects without regard to the 40 megawatts limitation. In making an allocation among irrigation districts, the Energy Commission shall assess the viability of each submission and whether it can be accomplished in the timeframe proposed. The Energy Commission shall have the discretion to allocate the load covered by this section in a manner that best ensures its usage within the allocation period.

(D) At least 50 percent of each year’s allocation to a district shall be applied to that portion of load that is used to power pumps for agricultural purposes.

(E) Any load pursuant to this subdivision shall be served by distribution facilities owned by, or leased to, the district in question.

(F) Any load allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be located within the boundaries of the affected irrigation district, or within the boundaries specified in an applicable service territory boundary agreement between an electrical corporation and the affected irrigation district. The provisions of subparagraph (C) of this paragraph shall be applicable to any load within the County of Stanislaus or San Joaquin, or both, served by any irrigation district that is currently serving or will be serving retail customers.

(2) Seventy-five megawatts of load served by the Merced Irrigation District hereafter prescribed in this paragraph:

(A) The total allocation provided by this paragraph shall be phased in over five years beginning January 1, 1997, so that one-fifth of the allocation is received in each of the five years. Any allocation that remains unused at the end of any year shall be carried over to the succeeding year and added to the allocation for that year.

(B) Any load to which the provision of this paragraph is applicable shall be served by distribution facilities owned by, or leased to, Merced Irrigation District.

(C) A load to which the provisions of this paragraph are applicable shall be located within the boundaries of Merced Irrigation District as those boundaries existed on December 20, 1995, together with the territory of Castle Air Force Base that was located outside of the district on that date.

(D) The total
 allocation provided by this paragraph shall be phased in over five years beginning January 1, 1997, with the exception of load already being served by the district as of June 1, 1996, which shall be deducted from the total allocation and shall not be subject to the costs provided in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376.

(3) To loads served by irrigation districts, water districts, water storage districts, municipal utility districts, and other water agencies that, on December 20, 1995, were members of the Southern San Joaquin Valley Power Authority, or the Eastside Power Authority, provided, however, that this paragraph shall be applicable only to that portion of each district or agency’s load that is used to power pumps that are owned by that district or agency as of December 20, 1995, or replacements thereof, and is being used to pump water for district purposes. The rates applicable to these districts and agencies shall be adjusted as of January
 1, 1997.

(4) The provisions of this subdivision shall no longer be operative after March 31, 2002.

(5) The provisions of paragraph (1) shall not be applicable to any irrigation district, water district, or water agency described in paragraph (2) or (3).

(6) Transmission services provided to any irrigation district described in paragraph (1) or (2) shall be provided pursuant to otherwise applicable tariffs.

(7) Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to grant the commission any jurisdiction over irrigation districts not already granted to the commission by existing law.

(b) To give the full effect to the legislative intent in enacting Section 701.8, the costs provided in Sections 367, 368,
 375, and 376 shall not apply to the load served by preference power purchased from a federal power marketing agency, or its successor, pursuant to Section 701.8 as it existed on January 1, 1996, provided that the power is used solely for the customer’s own systems load and not for sale. The costs of this provision shall be borne by all ratepayers in the affected service territory, notwithstanding the firewall established in subdivision (e) of Section 367.

(c) To give effect to an existing relationship, the obligation to pay the uneconomic costs specified in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 shall not apply to that portion of the load of the University of California campus situated in the County of Yolo that was being served as of May 31, 1996, by preference power purchased from a federal marketing agency, or its successor, provided that the power is used solely for the facility load of that campus and not, directly or indirectly, for
 sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 18.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

374.5.

Any electrical corporation serving agricultural customers that have multiple electric meters shall conduct research based on a statistically valid sample of those customers and meters to determine the typical simultaneous peak load of those customers. The results of the research shall be reported to the customers and the commission not later than July 1, 2001. The commission shall consider the research results in setting future electric distribution rates for those customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 909, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

(a) In order to mitigate potential negative impacts on utility personnel directly affected by electric industry restructuring, as described in Decision 95-12-063, as modified by Decision 96-01-009, the commission shall allow the recovery of reasonable employee related transition costs incurred and projected for severance, retraining, early retirement, outplacement and related expenses for the employees.

(b) The costs, including employee related transition costs for employees performing services in connection with Section 363, shall be added to the amount of uneconomic costs allowed to be recovered pursuant to this section and Sections 367, 368, and 376, provided recovery of these employee related transition costs shall extend beyond December 31, 2001, provided recovery of the costs shall not extend beyond December 31, 2006. However, there shall be no recovery for employee related transition costs associated with officers, senior supervisory employees, and professional employees performing predominantly regulatory functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

376.

To the extent that the costs of programs to accommodate implementation of direct access, the Power Exchange, and the Independent System Operator, that have been funded by an electrical corporation and have been found by the commission or the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to be recoverable from the utility’s customers, reduce an electrical corporation’s opportunity to recover its utility generation-related plant and regulatory assets by the end of the year 2001, the electrical corporation may recover unrecovered utility generation-related plant and regulatory assets after December 31, 2001, in an amount equal to the utility’s cost of commission-approved or Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approved restructuring-related implementation programs. An electrical corporation’s ability to collect the amounts from retail customers after the year 2001 shall be reduced to the extent the Independent System Operator or the Power Exchange reimburses the electrical corporation for the costs of any of these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

The commission shall continue to regulate the facilities for the generation of electricity owned by any public utility prior to January 1, 1997, that are subject to commission regulation until the owner of those facilities has applied to the commission to dispose of those facilities and has been authorized by the commission under Section 851 to undertake that disposal. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no facility for the generation of electricity owned by a public utility may be disposed of prior to January 1, 2006. The commission shall ensure that public utility generation assets remain dedicated to service for the benefit of California ratepayers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 3.   Effective January 18, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

377.1.

Section 377 does not apply to the four run-of-river hydroelectric project works located on the Truckee River, as referenced in Section 210(b)(17) of Public Law 101-618 or to the two run-of-river hydroelectric projects, also known as the Naches Drop plant and Naches plant, located on the Wapatox Canal on the Naches River in the State of Washington.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 840, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

377.2.

Notwithstanding Section 377, a facility for the generation of electricity, or an interest in a facility for the generation of electricity, that is located outside of this state, is owned by a public utility that serves 60,000 or fewer customer accounts in this state, and is not necessary to serve that public utility’s customers in this state, may be disposed of upon approval of the commission pursuant to Section 851 or upon exemption by the commission pursuant to Section 853.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 313.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

378.

The commission shall authorize new optional rate schedules and tariffs, including new service offerings, that accurately reflect the loads, locations, conditions of service, cost of service, and market opportunities of customer classes and subclasses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

379.

Nuclear decommissioning costs shall not be part of the costs described in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376, but shall be recovered as a nonbypassable charge until the time as the costs are fully recovered. Recovery of decommissioning costs may be accelerated to the extent possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

379.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or before March 7, 2001, the commission, in consultation with the Independent System Operator, shall take all of the following actions, and shall include the reasonable costs involved in taking those actions in the distribution revenue requirements of utilities regulated by the commission, as appropriate:

(a) (1) Identify and undertake those actions necessary to reduce or remove constraints on the state’s existing electrical transmission and distribution system, including, but not limited to, reconductoring of transmission lines, the addition of capacitors to increase voltage, the reinforcement of existing transmission capacity, and the installation of new transformer banks. The
 commission shall, in consultation with the Independent System Operator, give first priority to those geographical regions where congestion reduces or impedes electrical transmission and supply.

(2) Consistent with the existing statutory authority of the commission, afford electrical corporations a reasonable opportunity to fully recover costs it determines are reasonable and prudent to plan, finance, construct, operate, and maintain any facilities under its jurisdiction required by this section.

(b) In consultation with the Energy Commission, adopt energy conservation demand-side management and other initiatives in order to reduce demand for electricity and reduce load during peak demand periods. Those initiatives shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Expansion and acceleration of
 residential and commercial weatherization programs.

(2) Expansion and acceleration of programs to inspect and improve the operating efficiency of heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning equipment in new and existing buildings, to ensure that these systems achieve the maximum feasible cost-effective energy efficiency.

(3) Expansion and acceleration of programs to improve energy efficiency in new buildings, in order to achieve the maximum feasible reductions in uneconomic energy and peak electricity consumption.

(4) Incentives to equip commercial buildings with the capacity to automatically shut down or dim nonessential lighting and incrementally raise thermostats during a peak electricity demand period.

(5) Evaluation of installing local
 infrastructure to link temperature setback thermostats to real-time price signals.

(6) Incentives for load control and distributed generation to be paid for enhancing reliability.

(7) Differential incentives for renewable or super clean distributed generation resources pursuant to Section 379.6.

(8) Reevaluation of all efficiency cost-effectiveness tests in light of increases in wholesale electricity costs and of natural gas costs to explicitly include the system value of reduced load on reducing market clearing prices and volatility.

(c) In consultation with the Energy Commission, adopt and implement a residential, commercial, and industrial peak reduction program that encourages electric customers to reduce electricity consumption during peak power
 periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 19.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

379.6.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the self-generation incentive program increase deployment of distributed generation and energy storage systems to facilitate the integration of those resources into the electrical grid, improve efficiency and reliability of the distribution and transmission system, and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, peak demand, and ratepayer costs. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the commission, in future proceedings, provide for an equitable distribution of the costs and benefits of the program.

(2) The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, may authorize the annual collection of not more than double the amount authorized for the self-generation incentive program in
 the 2008 calendar year, through December 31, 2024. The commission shall require the administration of the program for distributed energy resources originally established pursuant to Chapter 329 of the Statutes of 2000 until January 1, 2026. On January 1, 2026, the commission shall provide repayment of all unallocated funds collected pursuant to this section to reduce ratepayer costs.

(b) (1) Eligibility for incentives under the self-generation incentive program that are funded through the annual collection authorized pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be limited to distributed energy resources that the commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, determines will achieve reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) On or before July 1, 2015, the commission shall update the factor for avoided greenhouse gas emissions based on both the most recent data available to the State Air Resources Board for greenhouse gas emissions from electricity sales in the self-generation incentive program administrators’ service
 areas and current estimates of greenhouse gas emissions over the useful life of the distributed energy resource, including consideration of the effects of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard.

(3) The commission shall adopt requirements for energy storage systems to ensure that eligible energy storage systems reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(c) Eligibility for the funding of any combustion-operated distributed generation projects using fossil fuel is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) An oxides of nitrogen (NOx) emissions rate standard of 0.07 pounds per megawatthour and a minimum efficiency of 60 percent, or any other NOx emissions rate and minimum efficiency standard adopted by the State Air Resources Board. A minimum efficiency of 60 percent shall be measured as
 useful energy output divided by fuel input. The efficiency determination shall be based on 100-percent load.

(2) Combined heat and power units that meet the 60-percent efficiency standard may take a credit to meet the applicable NOx emissions standard of 0.07 pounds per megawatthour. Credit shall be at the rate of one megawatthour for each 3,400,000 British thermal units (Btus) of heat recovered.

(3) The customer receiving incentives shall adequately maintain and service the combined heat and power units so that during operation the system continues to meet or exceed the efficiency and emissions standards established pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2).

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a project that does not meet the applicable NOx emissions standard is eligible if it meets both of the
 following requirements:

(A) The project operates solely on waste gas. The commission shall require a customer that applies for an incentive pursuant to this paragraph to provide an affidavit or other form of proof that specifies that the project shall be operated solely on waste gas. Incentives awarded pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to refund and shall be refunded by the recipient to the extent the project does not operate on waste gas. As used in this paragraph, “waste gas” means natural gas that is generated as a byproduct of petroleum production operations and is not eligible for delivery to the utility pipeline system.

(B) The air quality management district or air pollution control district, in issuing a permit to operate the project, determines that operation of the project will produce an onsite net air emissions benefit compared to permitted onsite emissions
 if the project does not operate. The commission shall require the customer to secure the permit before receiving incentives.

(d) In determining the eligibility for the self-generation incentive program, minimum system efficiency shall be determined either by calculating electrical and process heat efficiency as set forth in Section 216.6, or by calculating overall electrical efficiency.

(e) Eligibility for incentives under the self-generation incentive program shall be limited to distributed energy resource technologies that the commission determines meet all of the following
 requirements:

(1) The distributed energy resource technology shifts onsite energy use to off-peak time periods or reduces demand from the grid by offsetting some or all of the customer’s onsite energy load, including, but not limited to, net peak electric load.

(2) The distributed energy resource technology is commercially available.

(3) The distributed energy resource technology safely uses the existing transmission and distribution system.

(4) The
 distributed energy resource technology improves air quality by reducing criteria air pollutants.

(f) Recipients of the self-generation incentive program funds shall provide relevant data to the commission and the State Air Resources Board, upon request, and shall be subject to onsite inspection to verify equipment operation and performance, including capacity, thermal output, and usage to verify criteria air pollutant and greenhouse gas emissions performance.

(g) In administering the self-generation incentive program, the commission shall determine a capacity factor for each distributed generation system energy resource technology in the program.

(h) (1) In administering the self-generation incentive program, the commission may adjust the amount of
 incentives and evaluate other public policy interests, including, but not limited to, ratepayers, energy efficiency, peak load reduction, load management, and environmental interests.

(2) The commission shall consider the relative amount and the cost of greenhouse gas emissions reductions, peak demand reductions, system reliability benefits, and other measurable factors when allocating program funds between eligible technologies.

(i) The commission shall ensure that distributed generation resources are made available in the self-generation incentive program for all ratepayers.

(j) In administering the self-generation incentive program, the commission shall provide an
 additional incentive of 20 percent from existing program funds for the installation of eligible distributed generation resources manufactured in California.

(k) The costs of the self-generation incentive program shall not be recovered from customers participating in the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program.

(l) The commission shall evaluate the overall success and impact of the self-generation incentive program based on the following performance measures:

(1) The amount of reductions of emissions of greenhouse gases.

(2) The amount of reductions of emissions of criteria air pollutants measured in terms of avoided emissions and reductions of criteria air pollutants represented by emissions credits secured for project approval.

(3) The amount of energy reductions measured in energy value.

(4) The amount of reductions of customer peak demand.

(5) The ratio of the electricity generated by distributed energy resource generation projects receiving incentives from the self-generation incentive program to the electricity capable of being produced by those projects, commonly known as a capacity factor.

(6) The value to the electrical transmission and distribution system measured in avoided costs of transmission and distribution upgrades and replacement.

(7) The ability to improve onsite electricity reliability as compared to onsite electricity reliability before the self-generation incentive program technology was placed in service.

(m) On and after January 1, 2020, generation technologies using nonrenewable fuels shall not be eligible for incentives under the self-generation incentive program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 25.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

379.8.

(a) As used in this section, “advanced electrical distributed generation technology” means any electrical distributed generation technology that generates useful electricity and meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The emissions standards adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to the distributed generation certification program requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 94200) of Subchapter 8 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Produces de minimis emissions of sulfur oxides and nitrogen oxides.

(3) Meets the greenhouse gases
 emission performance standard established by the commission pursuant to Section 8341.

(4) Has a total electrical efficiency of not less than 45 percent. If legislation is enacted that increases the 42.5 percent efficiency described in subdivision (b) of Section 216.6 above 45 percent, the commission may adjust the electrical efficiency standard described in this paragraph to ensure that this electrical efficiency standard meets or exceeds the standard enacted for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 216.6.

(5) Is sized to meet the generator’s onsite electrical demand.

(6) Has parallel operation to the electrical distribution grid.

(7) Utilizes renewable or nonrenewable fuel.

(b) (1) An advanced electrical distributed generation technology shall qualify for the rate established by the commission pursuant to Section 454.4.

(2) The limitation in subdivision (b) of Section 6352 upon the assessment of surcharges for gas used to generate electricity by a nonutility facility applies to an advanced electrical distributed generation technology.

(3) The limitation in Section 2773.5 upon imposing alternative fuel capability requirements upon gas customers that use gas for purposes of cogeneration applies to an advanced electrical distributed generation technology.

(c) The commission or State Air Resources Board may, in furtherance of the state’s goals for achieving cost-effective reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases, meeting resource adequacy requirements,
 or meeting the renewables portfolio standard, treat advanced electrical distributed generation technology as cogeneration.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply to an advanced electrical distributed generation technology that is first operational at a site on and after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 146.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

379.9.

(a) In administering the self-generation incentive program pursuant to Section 379.6, the commission shall allocate at least 10 percent of the annual collection for the program in the 2020 calendar year for the installation of energy storage and other eligible distributed energy resources as determined by the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 379.6 for customers that operate a critical facility or critical infrastructure serving communities in high fire threat districts to support resiliency during a deenergization event. Eligible customers may include, but are not limited to, emergency responders, emergency operations centers, emergency shelters, water suppliers, wastewater agencies,
 fire stations, and police stations.

(b) In allocating funds pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Adjust the rules of the self-generation incentive program, if necessary, for the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) to allow for the use of backup power when electricity is shut off due to wildfire risk.

(2) Prioritize funding to projects for
 eligible customers that do all of the following:

(A) Demonstrate a financial need.

(B) Operate a critical facility or critical infrastructure serving communities in high fire threat districts during a deenergization event.

(C) Demonstrate coordination with the electrical corporation serving the customer’s community, relevant local governments, and the Office of Emergency Services for emergency and disaster planning and preparedness.

(3) Ensure that customers receiving funding pursuant to subdivision (a) are informed of the potential limitations of the energy storage and distributed energy resources system to provide reliable
 backup power, particularly for unplanned and extended loss of power.

(4) Include an evaluation of the performance and impact of the projects funded pursuant to subdivision (a) in a relevant self-generation incentive program evaluation report no later than December 31, 2022. The evaluation shall include a list of customers receiving funding and the type of customer operating each project. For a representative sampling of projects, the evaluation shall also include the known and expected performance of each project as a source of backup power; the impact of the project on greenhouse gas emissions; the communities served by the critical facility or critical infrastructure;
 customer coordination with the Office of Emergency Services, the electrical corporation serving the community, and relevant local governments; and any other information the commission deems useful.

(c) The commission may prioritize funding for additional customers located in high fire threat districts and may continue to prioritize self-generation incentive program funding for customers that operate critical facilities or critical infrastructure serving communities in high fire threat districts in subsequent years.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow for the use of incentives from the self-generation incentive program for generation technologies using nonrenewable fuels on or after
 January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (AB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

379.10.

(a) In administering the self-generation incentive program pursuant to Section 379.6, the commission shall use funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of providing incentives to eligible low-income residential customers, including those receiving service from a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined pursuant to Section 224.3, who install behind-the-meter energy storage systems or solar photovoltaic systems paired with energy storage systems, as an integrated approach to increase individual customer resiliency, to reduce the electrical grid’s net peak demand, to reduce electric ratepayer costs, and to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases and localized air pollution.

(b) The commission shall consider requiring customers installing solar
 photovoltaic systems paired with energy storage systems or new energy storage systems under this section and served on a standard contract or tariff pursuant Section 2827.1 to participate in a demand response or peak load reduction program offered through the customer’s load-serving entity, including market-integrated supply-side demand response programs, to reduce net peak demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 52, Sec. 6.   (SB 123)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

380.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the Independent System Operator, shall establish resource adequacy requirements for all load-serving entities.

(b) In establishing resource adequacy requirements, the commission shall ensure the reliability of electrical service in California while advancing, to the extent possible, the state’s goals for clean energy, reducing air pollution, and reducing emissions of greenhouse gases. The resource adequacy program shall achieve all of the following objectives:

(1) Facilitate the development of new generating, nongenerating, and hybrid capacity and the retention of existing generating, nongenerating, and hybrid capacity that is economical and needed for reliability
 and to achieve the state policy specified in Section 454.53.
